Missouri, session 2026, HB2326.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 67.307, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 67.307, to read as follows:
67.307. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Law enforcement officer", a sheriff or peace officer of a municipality with the
[duty and power of arrest for violation of] authority to enforce the general criminal laws of
the state or [for violation of] ordinances of municipalities;
(2) "Municipality", any county, city, town, or village;
(3) "Municipality official", any elected or appointed official or any law enforcement
officer serving the municipality;
(4) "Sanctuary policy", any municipality's policy, as reflected in an order or
ordinance, [enacted or followed] that:
(a) [Limits] Restricts or prohibits any municipality official or person employed by
the municipality from [communicating or] voluntarily cooperating with federal agencies or
officials [to verify or report the] regarding immigration status [of any alien within such
municipality]; or
(b) Grants [to illegal aliens the right to lawful presence or status within the
municipality] undocumented immigrants certain legal statuses or rights in direct
violation of federal law.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2326 2
2. [No municipality shall enact or adopt any sanctuary policy. Any municipality that
enacts or adopts a sanctuary policy shall be ineligible for any moneys provided through grants
administered by any state agency or department until the sanctuary policy is repealed or is no
longer in effect. Upon the complaint of any state resident regarding a specific government
entity, agency, or political subdivision of this state or prior to the provision of funds or
awarding of any grants to a government entity, agency, or political subdivision of this state,
any member of the general assembly may request that the attorney general of the state of
Missouri issue an opinion stating whether the government entity, agency, or political
subdivision has current policies in contravention of this section] (1) Municipalities shall
adopt policies that promote voluntary cooperation with federal and state immigration
authorities, consistent with federal law and public safety objectives.
(2) Municipal officials and law enforcement officers shall receive written
guidance on state and federal immigration enforcement responsibilities.
3. [The governing body, sheriff, or chief of police of each municipality shall provide
each law enforcement officer with written notice of their duty to cooperate with state and
federal agencies and officials on matters pertaining to enforcement of state and federal laws
governing immigration](1) Municipalities that adopt or maintain policies consistent with
federal law may be eligible for voluntary state funding, technical assistance, or training
programs to enhance public safety.
(2) If a municipality is believed to have a policy inconsistent with this section, the
state may provide written notice and a reasonable period to address concerns before any
funding restrictions are applied.
(3) Municipalities shall have the right to appeal or provide documentation
demonstrating compliance or public safety considerations before any funding
adjustments are made.
4. (1) This section shall [become effective on January 1, 2009] be construed to
promote public safety and cooperation between local law enforcement and federal
authorities.
(2) Municipalities retain discretion to adopt policies that protect victims of
crime, encourage reporting of criminal activity, and maintain community trust,
provided such policies do not violate federal law.
✔